tg/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/tg.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY абвгдеёжзиӣйклмнопрстуфхҳцчҷшъэюяғқӯ
WORDCHARS -
NOSUGGEST !

# Tajik language affix rules
# Generated from uniparser-grammar-tajik
# Paradigms: 4

SFX A Y 2
SFX A 0 и .
SFX A 0 у .
SFX B Y 537
SFX B 0 и .
SFX B 0 у .
SFX B 0 ам .
SFX B 0 ӣ .
SFX B 0 ст .
SFX B 0 ем .
SFX B 0 ед .
SFX B 0 анд .
SFX B 0 ҳо .
SFX B 0 ҳоам .
SFX B 0 ҳоӣ .
SFX B 0 ҳост .
SFX B 0 ҳоем .
SFX B 0 ҳоед .
SFX B 0 ҳоанд .
SFX B 0 от .
SFX B 0 отам .
SFX B 0 отӣ .
SFX B 0 отем .
SFX B 0 отед .
SFX B 0 отанд .
SFX B 0 он .
SFX B 0 онам .
SFX B 0 онӣ .
SFX B 0 онем .
SFX B 0 онед .
SFX B 0 онанд .
SFX B 0 ин .
SFX B 0 инам .
SFX B 0 инӣ .
SFX B 0 инем .
SFX B 0 инед .
SFX B 0 инанд .
SFX B 0 е .
SFX B 0 ҳое .
SFX B 0 оте .
SFX B 0 оне .
SFX B 0 ине .
SFX B 0 ест .
SFX B 0 ҳоест .
SFX B 0 отест .
SFX B 0 онест .
SFX B 0 инест .
SFX B 0 тар .
SFX B 0 тарам .
SFX B 0 тарӣ .
SFX B 0 тарем .
SFX B 0 таред .
SFX B 0 таранд .
SFX B 0 тарин .
SFX B 0 таринам .
SFX B 0 таринӣ .
SFX B 0 таринем .
SFX B 0 таринед .
SFX B 0 таринанд .
SFX B 0 таре .
SFX B 0 тарине .
SFX B 0 и .
SFX B 0 ҳои .
SFX B 0 оти .
SFX B 0 они .
SFX B 0 ини .
SFX B 0 тари .
SFX B 0 тарини .
SFX B 0 ро .
SFX B 0 ҳоро .
SFX B 0 отро .
SFX B 0 онро .
SFX B 0 инро .
SFX B 0 еро .
SFX B 0 ҳоеро .
SFX B 0 отеро .
SFX B 0 онеро .
SFX B 0 инеро .
SFX B 0 тарро .
SFX B 0 таринро .
SFX B 0 тареро .
SFX B 0 таринеро .
SFX B 0 хоеро .
SFX B 0 ҳоям .
SFX B 0 амро .
SFX B 0 ҳоямро .
SFX B 0 отамро .
SFX B 0 онамро .
SFX B 0 инамро .
SFX B 0 тарамро .
SFX B 0 таринамро .
SFX B 0 ат .
SFX B 0 ҳоят .
SFX B 0 отат .
SFX B 0 онат .
SFX B 0 инат .
SFX B 0 тарат .
SFX B 0 таринат .
SFX B 0 атро .
SFX B 0 ҳоятро .
SFX B 0 отатро .
SFX B 0 онатро .
SFX B 0 инатро .
SFX B 0 таратро .
SFX B 0 таринатро .
SFX B 0 аш .
SFX B 0 ҳояш .
SFX B 0 оташ .
SFX B 0 онаш .
SFX B 0 инаш .
SFX B 0 тараш .
SFX B 0 таринаш .
SFX B 0 ашро .
SFX B 0 ҳояшро .
SFX B 0 оташро .
SFX B 0 онашро .
SFX B 0 инашро .
SFX B 0 тарашро .
SFX B 0 таринашро .
SFX B 0 амон .
SFX B 0 ҳоямон .
SFX B 0 отамон .
SFX B 0 онамон .
SFX B 0 инамон .
SFX B 0 тарамон .
SFX B 0 таринамон .
SFX B 0 амонро .
SFX B 0 ҳоямонро .
SFX B 0 отамонро .
SFX B 0 онамонро .
SFX B 0 инамонро .
SFX B 0 тарамонро .
SFX B 0 таринамонро .
SFX B 0 атон .
SFX B 0 ҳоятон .
SFX B 0 отатон .
SFX B 0 онатон .
SFX B 0 инатон .
SFX B 0 таратон .
SFX B 0 таринатон .
SFX B 0 атонро .
SFX B 0 ҳоятонро .
SFX B 0 отатонро .
SFX B 0 онатонро .
SFX B 0 инатонро .
SFX B 0 таратонро .
SFX B 0 таринатонро .
SFX B 0 ашон .
SFX B 0 ҳояшон .
SFX B 0 оташон .
SFX B 0 онашон .
SFX B 0 инашон .
SFX B 0 тарашон .
SFX B 0 таринашон .
SFX B 0 ашонро .
SFX B 0 ҳояшонро .
SFX B 0 оташонро .
SFX B 0 онашонро .
SFX B 0 инашонро .
SFX B 0 тарашонро .
SFX B 0 таринашонро .
SFX B 0 ҳою .
SFX B 0 ҳову .
SFX B 0 оту .
SFX B 0 ону .
SFX B 0 ину .
SFX B 0 ею .
SFX B 0 еву .
SFX B 0 ҳоею .
SFX B 0 ҳоеву .
SFX B 0 отею .
SFX B 0 онею .
SFX B 0 инею .
SFX B 0 тару .
SFX B 0 тарину .
SFX B 0 тарею .
SFX B 0 таринею .
SFX B 0 рою .
SFX B 0 ҳорою .
SFX B 0 отрою .
SFX B 0 онрою .
SFX B 0 инрою .
SFX B 0 ерою .
SFX B 0 ҳоерою .
SFX B 0 отерою .
SFX B 0 онерою .
SFX B 0 инерою .
SFX B 0 таррою .
SFX B 0 таринрою .
SFX B 0 тарерою .
SFX B 0 таринерою .
SFX B 0 хоерою .
SFX B 0 аму .
SFX B 0 ҳояму .
SFX B 0 отаму .
SFX B 0 онаму .
SFX B 0 инаму .
SFX B 0 тараму .
SFX B 0 таринаму .
SFX B 0 амрою .
SFX B 0 ҳоямрою .
SFX B 0 отамрою .
SFX B 0 онамрою .
SFX B 0 инамрою .
SFX B 0 тарамрою .
SFX B 0 таринамрою .
SFX B 0 ату .
SFX B 0 ҳояту .
SFX B 0 отату .
SFX B 0 онату .
SFX B 0 инату .
SFX B 0 тарату .
SFX B 0 таринату .
SFX B 0 атрою .
SFX B 0 ҳоятрою .
SFX B 0 отатрою .
SFX B 0 онатрою .
SFX B 0 инатрою .
SFX B 0 таратрою .
SFX B 0 таринатрою .
SFX B 0 ашу .
SFX B 0 ҳояшу .
SFX B 0 оташу .
SFX B 0 онашу .
SFX B 0 инашу .
SFX B 0 тарашу .
SFX B 0 таринашу .
SFX B 0 ашрою .
SFX B 0 ҳояшрою .
SFX B 0 оташрою .
SFX B 0 онашрою .
SFX B 0 инашрою .
SFX B 0 тарашрою .
SFX B 0 таринашрою .
SFX B 0 амону .
SFX B 0 ҳоямону .
SFX B 0 отамону .
SFX B 0 онамону .
SFX B 0 инамону .
SFX B 0 тарамону .
SFX B 0 таринамону .
SFX B 0 амонрою .
SFX B 0 ҳоямонрою .
SFX B 0 отамонрою .
SFX B 0 онамонрою .
SFX B 0 инамонрою .
SFX B 0 тарамонрою .
SFX B 0 таринамонрою .
SFX B 0 атону .
SFX B 0 ҳоятону .
SFX B 0 отатону .
SFX B 0 онатону .
SFX B 0 инатону .
SFX B 0 таратону .
SFX B 0 таринатону .
SFX B 0 атонрою .
SFX B 0 ҳоятонрою .
SFX B 0 отатонрою .
SFX B 0 онатонрою .
SFX B 0 инатонрою .
SFX B 0 таратонрою .
SFX B 0 таринатонрою .
SFX B 0 ашону .
SFX B 0 ҳояшону .
SFX B 0 оташону .
SFX B 0 онашону .
SFX B 0 инашону .
SFX B 0 тарашону .
SFX B 0 таринашону .
SFX B 0 ашонроу .
SFX B 0 ҳояшонрою .
SFX B 0 оташонрою .
SFX B 0 онашонрою .
SFX B 0 инашонрою .
SFX B 0 тарашонрою .
SFX B 0 таринашонрою .
SFX B 0 у .
SFX B 0 ам .
SFX B 0 ӣ .
SFX B 0 ст .
SFX B 0 ем .
SFX B 0 ед .
SFX B 0 анд .
SFX B 0 ҳо .
SFX B 0 ҳоам .
SFX B 0 ҳоӣ .
SFX B 0 ҳост .
SFX B 0 ҳоем .
SFX B 0 ҳоед .
SFX B 0 ҳоанд .
SFX B 0 от .
SFX B 0 отам .
SFX B 0 отӣ .
SFX B 0 отем .
SFX B 0 отед .
SFX B 0 отанд .
SFX B 0 он .
SFX B 0 онам .
SFX B 0 онӣ .
SFX B 0 онем .
SFX B 0 онед .
SFX B 0 онанд .
SFX B 0 ин .
SFX B 0 инам .
SFX B 0 инӣ .
SFX B 0 инем .
SFX B 0 инед .
SFX B 0 инанд .
SFX B 0 е .
SFX B 0 ҳое .
SFX B 0 оте .
SFX B 0 оне .
SFX B 0 ине .
SFX B 0 тар .
SFX B 0 тарам .
SFX B 0 тарӣ .
SFX B 0 тарем .
SFX B 0 таред .
SFX B 0 таранд .
SFX B 0 тарин .
SFX B 0 таринам .
SFX B 0 таринӣ .
SFX B 0 таринем .
SFX B 0 таринед .
SFX B 0 таринанд .
SFX B 0 таре .
SFX B 0 тарине .
SFX B 0 ҳои .
SFX B 0 оти .
SFX B 0 они .
SFX B 0 ини .
SFX B 0 тари .
SFX B 0 тарини .
SFX B 0 ро .
SFX B 0 ҳоро .
SFX B 0 отро .
SFX B 0 онро .
SFX B 0 инро .
SFX B 0 еро .
SFX B 0 ҳоеро .
SFX B 0 отеро .
SFX B 0 онеро .
SFX B 0 инеро .
SFX B 0 тарро .
SFX B 0 таринро .
SFX B 0 тареро .
SFX B 0 таринеро .
SFX B 0 хоеро .
SFX B 0 ҳоям .
SFX B 0 амро .
SFX B 0 ҳоямро .
SFX B 0 отамро .
SFX B 0 онамро .
SFX B 0 инамро .
SFX B 0 тарамро .
SFX B 0 таринамро .
SFX B 0 ат .
SFX B 0 ҳоят .
SFX B 0 отат .
SFX B 0 онат .
SFX B 0 инат .
SFX B 0 тарат .
SFX B 0 таринат .
SFX B 0 атро .
SFX B 0 ҳоятро .
SFX B 0 отатро .
SFX B 0 онатро .
SFX B 0 инатро .
SFX B 0 таратро .
SFX B 0 таринатро .
SFX B 0 аш .
SFX B 0 ҳояш .
SFX B 0 оташ .
SFX B 0 онаш .
SFX B 0 инаш .
SFX B 0 тараш .
SFX B 0 таринаш .
SFX B 0 ашро .
SFX B 0 ҳояшро .
SFX B 0 оташро .
SFX B 0 онашро .
SFX B 0 инашро .
SFX B 0 тарашро .
SFX B 0 таринашро .
SFX B 0 амон .
SFX B 0 ҳоямон .
SFX B 0 отамон .
SFX B 0 онамон .
SFX B 0 инамон .
SFX B 0 тарамон .
SFX B 0 таринамон .
SFX B 0 амонро .
SFX B 0 ҳоямонро .
SFX B 0 отамонро .
SFX B 0 онамонро .
SFX B 0 инамонро .
SFX B 0 тарамонро .
SFX B 0 таринамонро .
SFX B 0 атон .
SFX B 0 ҳоятон .
SFX B 0 отатон .
SFX B 0 онатон .
SFX B 0 инатон .
SFX B 0 таратон .
SFX B 0 таринатон .
SFX B 0 атонро .
SFX B 0 ҳоятонро .
SFX B 0 отатонро .
SFX B 0 онатонро .
SFX B 0 инатонро .
SFX B 0 таратонро .
SFX B 0 таринатонро .
SFX B 0 ашон .
SFX B 0 ҳояшон .
SFX B 0 оташон .
SFX B 0 онашон .
SFX B 0 инашон .
SFX B 0 тарашон .
SFX B 0 таринашон .
SFX B 0 ашонро .
SFX B 0 ҳояшонро .
SFX B 0 оташонро .
SFX B 0 онашонро .
SFX B 0 инашонро .
SFX B 0 тарашонро .
SFX B 0 таринашонро .
SFX B 0 ҳою .
SFX B 0 ҳову .
SFX B 0 оту .
SFX B 0 ону .
SFX B 0 ину .
SFX B 0 ею .
SFX B 0 еву .
SFX B 0 ҳоею .
SFX B 0 ҳоеву .
SFX B 0 отею .
SFX B 0 онею .
SFX B 0 инею .
SFX B 0 тару .
SFX B 0 тарину .
SFX B 0 тарею .
SFX B 0 таринею .
SFX B 0 рою .
SFX B 0 ҳорою .
SFX B 0 отрою .
SFX B 0 онрою .
SFX B 0 инрою .
SFX B 0 ерою .
SFX B 0 ҳоерою .
SFX B 0 отерою .
SFX B 0 онерою .
SFX B 0 инерою .
SFX B 0 таррою .
SFX B 0 таринрою .
SFX B 0 тарерою .
SFX B 0 таринерою .
SFX B 0 хоерою .
SFX B 0 аму .
SFX B 0 ҳояму .
SFX B 0 отаму .
SFX B 0 онаму .
SFX B 0 инаму .
SFX B 0 тараму .
SFX B 0 таринаму .
SFX B 0 амрою .
SFX B 0 ҳоямрою .
SFX B 0 отамрою .
SFX B 0 онамрою .
SFX B 0 инамрою .
SFX B 0 тарамрою .
SFX B 0 таринамрою .
SFX B 0 ату .
SFX B 0 ҳояту .
SFX B 0 отату .
SFX B 0 онату .
SFX B 0 инату .
SFX B 0 тарату .
SFX B 0 таринату .
SFX B 0 атрою .
SFX B 0 ҳоятрою .
SFX B 0 отатрою .
SFX B 0 онатрою .
SFX B 0 инатрою .
SFX B 0 таратрою .
SFX B 0 таринатрою .
SFX B 0 ашу .
SFX B 0 ҳояшу .
SFX B 0 оташу .
SFX B 0 онашу .
SFX B 0 инашу .
SFX B 0 тарашу .
SFX B 0 таринашу .
SFX B 0 ашрою .
SFX B 0 ҳояшрою .
SFX B 0 оташрою .
SFX B 0 онашрою .
SFX B 0 инашрою .
SFX B 0 тарашрою .
SFX B 0 таринашрою .
SFX B 0 амону .
SFX B 0 ҳоямону .
SFX B 0 отамону .
SFX B 0 онамону .
SFX B 0 инамону .
SFX B 0 тарамону .
SFX B 0 таринамону .
SFX B 0 амонрою .
SFX B 0 ҳоямонрою .
SFX B 0 отамонрою .
SFX B 0 онамонрою .
SFX B 0 инамонрою .
SFX B 0 тарамонрою .
SFX B 0 таринамонрою .
SFX B 0 атону .
SFX B 0 ҳоятону .
SFX B 0 отатону .
SFX B 0 онатону .
SFX B 0 инатону .
SFX B 0 таратону .
SFX B 0 таринатону .
SFX B 0 атонрою .
SFX B 0 ҳоятонрою .
SFX B 0 отатонрою .
SFX B 0 онатонрою .
SFX B 0 инатонрою .
SFX B 0 таратонрою .
SFX B 0 таринатонрою .
SFX B 0 ашону .
SFX B 0 ҳояшону .
SFX B 0 оташону .
SFX B 0 онашону .
SFX B 0 инашону .
SFX B 0 тарашону .
SFX B 0 таринашону .
SFX B 0 ашонроу .
SFX B 0 ҳояшонрою .
SFX B 0 оташонрою .
SFX B 0 онашонрою .
SFX B 0 инашонрою .
SFX B 0 тарашонрою .
SFX B 0 таринашонрою .
SFX C Y 126
SFX C 0 у .
SFX C 0 ам .
SFX C 0 аму .
SFX C 0 ям .
SFX C 0 яму .
SFX C 0 ӣю .
SFX C 0 ӣ .
SFX C 0 0 .
SFX C 0 ем .
SFX C 0 ему .
SFX C 0 ед .
SFX C 0 еду .
SFX C 0 етон .
SFX C 0 етону .
SFX C 0 анд .
SFX C 0 анду .
SFX C 0 янд .
SFX C 0 янду .
SFX C 0 аам .
SFX C 0 ааму .
SFX C 0 аӣ .
SFX C 0 аӣю .
SFX C 0 аӣву .
SFX C 0 ааст .
SFX C 0 аасту .
SFX C 0 аст .
SFX C 0 асту .
SFX C 0 аем .
SFX C 0 аему .
SFX C 0 аед .
SFX C 0 аеду .
SFX C 0 аетон .
SFX C 0 аетону .
SFX C 0 аанд .
SFX C 0 аанду .
SFX C 0 ам .
SFX C 0 аму .
SFX C 0 ям .
SFX C 0 яму .
SFX C 0 ӣ .
SFX C 0 ӣю .
SFX C 0 ӣву .
SFX C 0 ад .
SFX C 0 аду .
SFX C 0 яд .
SFX C 0 яду .
SFX C 0 ем .
SFX C 0 ему .
SFX C 0 ед .
SFX C 0 еду .
SFX C 0 етон .
SFX C 0 етону .
SFX C 0 анд .
SFX C 0 анду .
SFX C 0 янд .
SFX C 0 янду .
SFX C 0 0 .
SFX C 0 у .
SFX C 0 аниам .
SFX C 0 аниаму .
SFX C 0 анистам .
SFX C 0 анистаму .
SFX C 0 аниӣ .
SFX C 0 аниӣю .
SFX C 0 аниӣву .
SFX C 0 анистӣ .
SFX C 0 анистӣю .
SFX C 0 анистӣву .
SFX C 0 анист .
SFX C 0 анисту .
SFX C 0 анием .
SFX C 0 аниему .
SFX C 0 анистем .
SFX C 0 анистему .
SFX C 0 аниед .
SFX C 0 аниеду .
SFX C 0 анистед .
SFX C 0 анистеду .
SFX C 0 аниетон .
SFX C 0 аниетону .
SFX C 0 анистетон .
SFX C 0 анистетону .
SFX C 0 анианд .
SFX C 0 анианду .
SFX C 0 анистанд .
SFX C 0 анистанду .
SFX C 0 aгистам .
SFX C 0 aгистаму .
SFX C 0 агистӣ .
SFX C 0 агистӣю .
SFX C 0 агистӣву .
SFX C 0 агист .
SFX C 0 агисту .
SFX C 0 aгистем .
SFX C 0 aгистему .
SFX C 0 агистед .
SFX C 0 агистеду .
SFX C 0 агистетон .
SFX C 0 агистетону .
SFX C 0 агистанд .
SFX C 0 агистанду .
SFX C 0 aгем .
SFX C 0 aгему .
SFX C 0 агед .
SFX C 0 агеду .
SFX C 0 аген .
SFX C 0 агену .
SFX C 0 а .
SFX C 0 аву .
SFX C 0 ашуда .
SFX C 0 ашудаву .
SFX C 0 агӣ .
SFX C 0 агӣю .
SFX C 0 агӣву .
SFX C 0 анӣ .
SFX C 0 анӣю .
SFX C 0 анӣву .
SFX C 0 анда .
SFX C 0 андау .
SFX C 0 янда .
SFX C 0 яндау .
SFX C 0 он .
SFX C 0 ону .
SFX C 0 ён .
SFX C 0 ёну .
SFX C 0 ан<.> .
SFX D Y 1
SFX D 0 у .
